Virginia statutes. Title 28.2. Fisheries and Habitat of the Tidal Waters
Article 1. Ownership and Uses of Submerged Lands

§ 28.2-1200.
Ungranted beds of bays, rivers, creeks and shores of the sea to remain in common.

All the beds of the bays, rivers, creeks and the shores of the sea within the jurisdiction of the Commonwealth, not conveyed by special grant or compact according to law, shall remain the property of the Commonwealth and may be used as a common by all the people of the Commonwealth for the purpose of fishing, fowling, hunting, and taking and catching oysters and other shellfish. No grant shall be issued by the Librarian of Virginia to pass any estate or interest of the Commonwealth in any natural oyster bed, rock, or shoal, whether or not it ebbs bare.

History.

Code 1950, §

62-1

; 1960, c. 533; 1968, c. 659, §

62.1-1

; 1992, c. 836; 1995, c. 850; 1998, c. 427.

Cross references.

As to certificates issued under §

62.1-44.15

et seq. relating to dredging projects governed under §

28.2-1200

et seq. or §

28.2-1300

et seq., see §

62.1-44.15

(5c).

As to right of riparian owner to dredge sand and gravel from land under water, see §§

62.1-190

through

62.1-193

.

Law Review.

For article, “Property Law,” see 35 U. Rich. L. Rev. 777 (2001).

Michie’s Jurisprudence.

For related discussion, see

8B M.J. Fish and Fisheries, § 3; 14A M.J. Oysters, § 2; 15 M.J. Public Lands, § 4; 20 M.J. Waters and Watercourses, §§ 26, 28.

§ 28.2-1200.1.
Conveyance of state-owned bottomlands.

In order to fulfill the Commonwealth’s responsibility under Article XI of the Constitution of Virginia to conserve and protect public lands for the benefit of the people, the Commonwealth shall not convey fee simple title to state-owned bottomlands covered by waters. However, the Commonwealth may grant a lease, easement, or other limited interest in state-owned bottomlands covered by waters pursuant to §

28.2-1208

or as long as the property is used by a governmental entity for the performance of a governmental activity, as defined in §§

28.2-1300

and

28.2-1400

.

The Commonwealth may convey fee simple title to specified parcels of state-owned bottomlands that have been lawfully filled. For the purpose of this section, “lawfully filled” means the deposit of fill was (i) authorized by statute, (ii) pursuant to valid court order, (iii) authorized or permitted by state officials pursuant to statutory authority subsequent to July 1, 1960, or (iv) under apparent color of authority prior to July 1, 1960. In the absence of information to the contrary, it may be presumed that state-owned bottomlands filled prior to July 1, 1960, were filled under apparent color of authority and, it may also be presumed, that all of the fill on the specified parcel was lawfully authorized if a substantial portion of the fill on such parcel was authorized. Properties not qualified under clauses (i) through (iv) of this subdivision shall not be eligible for conveyance under this section.
B. 1. The Commonwealth may convey fee simple title to specified parcels of state-owned bottomlands that have been lawfully filled. For the purpose of this section, “lawfully filled” means the deposit of fill was (i) authorized by statute, (ii) pursuant to valid court order, (iii) authorized or permitted by state officials pursuant to statutory authority subsequent to July 1, 1960, or (iv) under apparent color of authority prior to July 1, 1960. In the absence of information to the contrary, it may be presumed that state-owned bottomlands filled prior to July 1, 1960, were filled under apparent color of authority and, it may also be presumed, that all of the fill on the specified parcel was lawfully authorized if a substantial portion of the fill on such parcel was authorized. Properties not qualified under clauses (i) through (iv) of this subdivision shall not be eligible for conveyance under this section.

Titles to lands that (i) were once or may have been state-owned bottomlands covered by waters, (ii) were filled prior to July 1, 1960, and (iii) were acquired by private persons in good faith for value after such lands were filled, are hereby declared to be free and clear of any claimed ownership or interest by the Commonwealth and are released to such private persons and their successors and assigns by the Commonwealth to the extent that the areas of these lands were not state-owned bottomlands covered by waters on July 1, 1960.

This subsection shall not apply to any state-owned bottomlands filled by a publicly funded initiative and put to a continuing public use, which includes beach nourishment projects and public landings.

Except as provided in subsection D, the grantee in a conveyance under subdivision B 1 shall compensate the Commonwealth in an amount commensurate with the property interest being conveyed, which shall be considered equivalent to 25 percent of the assessed value of the specified parcel, exclusive of any buildings or other improvements. The assessed value shall be established as the average of the local real estate tax assessments for the most recent 10 years available for the specified parcel. If no such assessments are available for the specified parcel, then the assessed value shall be calculated as the percentage, by square footage or acreage, that the specified parcel represents of the larger parcel for which such assessments are available.

If the Commission determines that unique circumstances exist, the Commission may allow the grantee in a conveyance under subdivision B 1 to compensate the Commonwealth in an amount less than 25 percent of the assessed value of the specified parcel. Any such determination by the Commission shall be justified in writing and shall not be subject to judicial review.

History.

2007, c. 879; 2011, c. 734.

Editor’s note.

Acts 2007, c. 879, cl. 2 provides: “That the provisions of this act shall not affect any litigation that is pending on the effective date of this act.”

Acts 2011, c. 733 also amended this section but could not be reconciled with Acts 2011, c. 734. The section was set out as amended by Acts 2011, c. 734 at the direction of the Virginia Code Commission.

Acts 2011, c. 734, cl. 2 provides: “That any payments made to the Commonwealth for conveyances of state-owned bottomlands prior to July 1, 2011, shall not be refundable.”

The 2011 amendments.

The 2011 amendment by c. 734, effective October 1, 2011, substituted “subdivision” for “subsection” in subdivision B 1; added subdivision B 2 and 3; and inserted “in a conveyance under subdivision B 1” preceding “to compensate the Commonwealth in an amount” in the first sentence of subsection D and rewrote C and D.

Research References.

Friend’s Virginia Pleading and Practice (Matthew Bender). Chapter 27, Property Actions. § 27.09 Ejectment. Friend.

Virginia Forms (Matthew Bender). No. 16-568. Deed of Easement for Foot Wharf Facilities.

§ 28.2-1201.
Ungranted islands which rise from lands which are property of the Commonwealth.

Except as otherwise provided in subsections B and C hereof, all ungranted islands which rise by natural or artificial causes from the beds of bays, rivers and creeks that are ungranted under §

28.2-1200

shall remain the property of the Commonwealth and shall be managed by the Commission as provided in Article 2 (§

28.2-1503

et seq.) of Chapter 15 of this title. In case of any conflict between the provisions of this subsection and the common law of accretion, reliction and avulsion, such common law shall control.

Any island or land that is owned by the Commonwealth, whether currently in existence or subsequently created, that now or hereafter abuts a barrier island of the Eastern Shore shall remain the property of the Commonwealth and shall be managed by the Commission as provided in Article 2 (§

28.2-1503

et seq.) of Chapter 15 of this title.

This section shall not apply to accretions to privately owned lands or islands, whether or not they are used as commons.

History.

1991, c. 378, §

41.1-4.1

; 1992, c. 836; 1995, c. 850.

Law Review.

For note, “As Virginia Strives for a Lead in the Aquaculture Industry, Issues Between Property Owners and Oyster Farmers Rise to the Surface,” 32 Regent U.L. Rev. 135 (2019).

§ 28.2-1202.
Rights of owners to extend to mean low-water mark.

Subject to the provisions of §

28.2-1200

, the limits or bounds of the tracts of land lying on the bays, rivers, creeks, and shores within the jurisdiction of the Commonwealth, and the rights and privileges of the owners of such lands, shall extend to the mean low-water mark but no farther, except where a creek or river, or some part thereof, is comprised within the limits of a lawful survey.

For purposes of this section, “lawful survey” means the boundaries of any land, including submerged lands, held under a special grant or compact as required by §

28.2-1200

, such boundaries having been determined by generally accepted surveying methods and evidenced by a plat or map thereof recorded in the circuit court clerk’s office of the county or city in which the land lies.

Notwithstanding any provision of law to the contrary, where sand or other material is placed upon state-owned beds of the bays, rivers, creeks, or shores of the sea channelward of the mean low-water mark as part of the performance of a properly permitted beach nourishment, storm protection, or dredging project undertaken by a public body, and the public has an established right of use and maintenance upon the adjacent land above the mean low-water mark, whether such public right is established before or after the sand or other material is placed, such placement shall not be deemed a severance or taking of, or otherwise to have impaired, an adjacent landowner’s riparian or littoral rights, and the newly created land channelward of the former mean low-water mark shall be deemed natural accretion for purposes of ownership, but such ownership shall be subject to the public’s same right of use and maintenance upon the newly created land as previously existed on the adjacent land above the mean low-water mark. This subsection is retroactively effective beginning January 1, 2009.

History.

Code 1950, § 62-2; 1968, c. 659, § 62.1-2; 1972, c. 865; 1992, c. 836; 2014, cc. 106, 234.

The 2014 amendments.

The 2014 amendments by cc. 106 and 234 are identical, and added subsection C.

§ 28.2-1203.
Unlawful use of subaqueous beds; penalty.

It shall be unlawful for any person to build, dump, trespass or encroach upon or over, or take or use any materials from the beds of the bays, ocean, rivers, streams, or creeks which are the property of the Commonwealth, unless such act is performed pursuant to a permit issued by the Commission or is necessary for the following:

Erection of dams, the construction of which has been authorized by proper authority;

Uses of subaqueous beds authorized elsewhere in this title;

Construction and maintenance of congressionally approved navigation and flood-control projects undertaken by the United States Army Corps of Engineers, the United States Coast Guard, or other federal agency authorized by Congress to regulate navigation, navigable waters, or flood control;

Construction of piers, docks, marine terminals, and port facilities owned or leased by or to the Commonwealth or any of its political subdivisions;

Except as provided in subsection D of §

28.2-1205

, placement, after submission of an application to the Commission for review and processing, of private piers for noncommercial purposes by owners of the riparian lands in the waters opposite those lands, provided that (i) the piers do not extend beyond the navigation line or private pier lines established by the Commission or the United States Army Corps of Engineers, (ii) the piers do not exceed six feet in width and finger piers do not exceed five feet in width, (iii) any L or T head platforms and appurtenant floating docking platforms do not exceed, in the aggregate, 400 square feet, (iv) if prohibited by local ordinance open-sided shelter roofs or gazebo-type structures shall not be placed on platforms as described in clause (iii), but may be placed on such platforms if not prohibited by local ordinance, and (v) the piers are determined not to be a navigational hazard by the Commission. Subject to any applicable local ordinances, such piers may include an attached boat lift and an open-sided roof designed to shelter a single boat slip or boat lift. In cases in which open-sided roofs designed to shelter a single boat, boat slip or boat lift will exceed 700 square feet in coverage or the open-sided shelter roofs or gazebo structures exceed 400 square feet, and in cases in which an adjoining property owner objects to a proposed roof structure, permits shall be required as provided in §

28.2-1204

;

Maintenance or replacement of a previously authorized pier, provided that it is reconstructed within the footprint of the existing pier;

Agricultural, horticultural or silvicultural irrigation on riparian lands or the watering of animals on riparian lands, provided that (i) no permanent structure is placed on or over the subaqueous bed, (ii) the person withdrawing water complies with requirements administered by the Department of Environmental Quality under Title 62.1, and (iii) the activity is conducted without adverse impacts to instream beneficial uses as defined in §

62.1-10

; or

Recreational gold mining, provided that (i) a man-portable suction dredge no larger than four inches in diameter is used, (ii) rights of riparian property owners are not affected, (iii) the activity is conducted without adverse impacts to instream beneficial uses as defined in §

62.1-10

, (iv) the activity is conducted without adverse impacts to underwater historic properties and related objects as defined in § 10.1-2214, and (v) the activity is not defined as mining in §

45.2-1200

.

A violation of this section is a Class 1 misdemeanor.

History.

Code 1950, § 62-2.1; 1960, c. 600; 1962, c. 637; 1966, c. 641; 1968, c. 659, § 62.1-3; 1970, c. 621; 1972, c. 866; 1973, cc. 23, 361; 1974, cc. 92, 385; 1975, c. 431; 1976, c. 579; 1980, c. 253; 1982, c. 102; 1988, c. 868; 1992, c. 836; 1998, c. 605; 2000, c. 167; 2001, c. 234; 2003, c. 973; 2006, c. 507; 2007, c. 25; 2020, c. 806; 2022, c. 159.

Cross references.

As to Oyster Replenishment Fund, see §

28.2-542

.

As to punishment for Class 1 misdemeanors, see §

18.2-11

.

Editor’s note.

Effective October 1, 2021, “§

45.2-1200

” was substituted for “§ 45.1-180” to conform to the recodification of Title 45.1 by Acts 2021, Sp. Sess. I, c. 387, at the direction of the Virginia Code Commission.

The 2000 amendments.

The 2000 amendment by c. 167 inserted “the” preceding “United States Coast Guard” in subdivision A 3, and added “Except as provided in subsection D of §

28.2-1205

” at the beginning of subdivision A 5.

The 2001 amendments.

The 2001 amendment by c. 234, in subsection A, deleted “or” at the end of subdivision 4, inserted “or” at the end of subdivision 5, and added subdivision 6.

The 2003 amendments.

The 2003 amendment by c. 973, in the first sentence of subdivision 5, inserted the clause (i) designation, and inserted clauses (ii) through (iv).

The 2006 amendments.

The 2006 amendment by c. 507, in subdivision A 5, inserted “and finger piers do not exceed five feet in width” in clause (ii), in clause (iii) substituted the language beginning “platforms and appurtenant” for “construction platforms or protrusions do not exceed 250 total square feet,” inserted clause (iv), redesignated former clause (iv) as clause (v), and in the last sentence, substituted “open-sided roofs designed to shelter a single boat, boat slip or boat lift” for “such roofs” and inserted “or the open-sided shelter roofs or gazebo structures exceed 400 square feet.”

The 2007 amendments.

The 2007 amendment by c. 25 added A 7 and made related changes.

The 2020 amendments.

The 2020 amendments by c. 806, in subdivision A 5, inserted “after submission of an application to the Commission for review and processing” in the first sentence and made stylistic changes.

The 2022 amendments.

The 2022 amendment by c. 159 added subdivision A 6 and redesignated accordingly.

§ 28.2-1204.
Authority of Commission over submerged lands.

The Commission is authorized to:

Issue permits for all reasonable uses of state-owned bottomlands not authorized under subsection A of §

28.2-1203

, including but not limited to, dredging, the taking and use of material, and the placement of wharves, bulkheads, and fill by owners of riparian land in the waters opposite their lands, provided such wharves, bulkheads, and fill do not extend beyond any lawfully established bulkhead lines;

Issue permits to recover underwater historic property pursuant to §§ 10.1-2214 and

28.2-1203

; and

Establish bulkhead and private pier lines on or over the bays, rivers, creeks, streams, and shores of the ocean which are owned by or subject to the jurisdiction of the Commonwealth for this purpose, and to issue and publish maps and plats showing these lines; however, these lines shall not conflict with those established by the United States Army Corps of Engineers.

History.

Code 1950, § 62-2.1; 1960, c. 600; 1962, c. 637; 1966, c. 641; 1968, c. 659, § 62.1-3; 1970, c. 621; 1972, c. 866; 1973, cc. 23, 361; 1974, cc. 92, 385; 1975, c. 431; 1976, c. 579; 1980, c. 253; 1982, c. 102; 1988, c. 868; 1992, c. 836.

Cross references.

As to Oyster Replenishment Fund, see §

28.2-542

.

§ 28.2-1204.1.
Submerged aquatic vegetation.

The Commission shall, in consultation with the Virginia Institute of Marine Science, develop guidelines containing criteria for use in:

Defining existing beds of submerged aquatic vegetation; and

Delineating areas where there is potential for submerged aquatic vegetation restoration.

History.

1999, c. 547.

§ 28.2-1204.2.
Marine Habitat and Waterways Improvement Fund established.

There is hereby created in the state treasury a special nonreverting fund to be known as the Marine Habitat and Waterways Improvement Fund, hereafter referred to as “the Fund.” The Fund shall be established on the books of the Comptroller. In addition to the receipt of moneys as may be specifically provided by law, the Commissioner is authorized to accept gifts and grants for the Fund, as well as proceeds that may be received from time to time on the sale of state-owned marine lands. Interest earned on moneys in the Fund shall remain in the Fund and be credited to it. Any moneys remaining in the Fund, including interest thereon, at the end of each fiscal year shall not revert to the general fund but shall remain in the Fund. Moneys in the Fund shall be used solely for the purposes of improving marine habitat and waterways, including the removal of obstructions or hazardous property from state waters as authorized in §§

15.2-909

and

28.2-1210

. Expenditures and disbursements from the Fund shall be made by the State Treasurer on warrants issued by the Comptroller upon written request signed by the Commissioner.

History.

2000, c. 1056.

Effective date.

Acts 2000, c. 1056, cl. 3, provided that the provisions of the act would take effect on July 1, 2001.

§ 28.2-1205.
Permits for the use of state-owned bottomlands.

When determining whether to grant or deny any permit for the use of state-owned bottomlands, the Commission shall be guided in its deliberations by the provisions of Article XI, Section I of the Constitution of Virginia. In addition to other factors, the Commission shall also consider the public and private benefits of the proposed project and shall exercise its authority under this section consistent with the public trust doctrine as defined by the common law of the Commonwealth adopted pursuant to §

1-200

in order to protect and safeguard the public right to the use and enjoyment of the subaqueous lands of the Commonwealth held in trust by it for the benefit of the people as conferred by the public trust doctrine and the Constitution of Virginia. The Commission shall also consider the project’s effect on the following:

Other reasonable and permissible uses of state waters and state-owned bottomlands;

Marine and fisheries resources of the Commonwealth;

Tidal wetlands, except when this has or will be determined under the provisions of Chapter 13 of this title;

Adjacent or nearby properties;

Water quality; and

Submerged aquatic vegetation (SAV).

The Commission shall consult with other state agencies, including the Virginia Institute of Marine Science, the State Water Control Board, the Virginia Department of Transportation, and the State Corporation Commission, whenever the Commission’s decision on a permit application relates to or affects the particular concerns or activities of those agencies.

No permit for a marina or boatyard for commercial use shall be granted until the owner or other applicant presents to the Commission a plan for sewage treatment or disposal facilities that has been approved by the State Department of Health.

A permit is required and shall be issued by the Commission for placement of any private pier measuring 100 or more feet in length from the mean low-water mark, which is used for noncommercial purposes by an owner of the riparian land in the waters opposite the land, and that traverses commercially productive leased oyster or clam grounds, as defined in §

28.2-630

, provided that the pier does not extend beyond the navigation line established by the Commission or the United States Army Corps of Engineers. The permit may reasonably prescribe the design and location of the pier for the sole purpose of minimizing the adverse impact on such oyster or clam grounds or the harvesting or propagation of oysters or clams therefrom. The permit shall contain no other conditions or requirements. Unless information or circumstances materially alter the conditions under which the permit would be issued, the Commission shall act within 90 days of receipt of a complete joint permit application to approve or deny the application. If the Commission fails to act within that time, the application shall be deemed approved and the applicant shall be notified of the deemed approval.

All permits issued by the Commission for the use of state-owned bottomlands pursuant to §

28.2-1204

, or to recover underwater historic property shall be in writing and specify the conditions and terms that the Commission determines are appropriate, and royalties unless prohibited under other provisions of this chapter.

Any person aggrieved by a decision of the Commission under this section is entitled to judicial review in accordance with the provisions of the Administrative Process Act (§

2.2-4000

et seq.). However, any decision made by the Commission hereunder consistent with the public trust doctrine as defined by the common law of the Commonwealth adopted pursuant to §

1-200

shall not be deemed to have been made pursuant to the police power. No person shall reapply for the same or substantially similar use of the bottomlands within 12 months of the denial of a permit by the Commission. Nothing in this subsection shall be construed to deprive a riparian landowner of such rights as he may have under common law.

History.

Code 1950, § 62-2.1; 1960, c. 600; 1962, c. 637; 1966, c. 641; 1968, c. 659, § 62.1-3; 1970, c. 621; 1972, c. 866; 1973, cc. 23, 361; 1974, cc. 92, 385; 1975, c. 431; 1976, c. 579; 1980, c. 253; 1982, c. 102; 1988, c. 868; 1992, c. 836; 1996, c. 228; 1999, c. 741; 2000, c. 167; 2001, c. 72; 2004, cc. 405, 899, 1018; 2005, c. 839.

Cross references.

As to temporary enclosures on leased oyster-planting grounds, see §

28.2-603.1

. As to coordinated review of water resources projects, see §

62.1-44.15:5.01

.

Editor’s note.

Acts 2021, Sp. Sess. I, c. 270, cl. 1 provides: “That any permit renewal required pursuant to §

28.2-1205

or

28.2-1306

of the Code of Virginia for a permit that was set to expire between March 1, 2020, and July 1, 2021, shall retroactively be considered valid and effective until January 1, 2022.”

The 2000 amendments.

The 2000 amendment by c. 167 added present subsection D and redesignated former subsections D and E as present subsections E and F.

The 2001 amendments.

The 2001 amendment by c. 72 added the last two sentences in subsection D.

The 2004 amendments.

The 2004 amendment by c. 405 substituted “90” for “ninety” in the next-to-last sentence of subsection D; and inserted the next-to-last sentence in subsection F.

The 2004 amendment by c. 899, in subsection E, inserted “pursuant to §

28.2-1203

,” substituted “and terms that” for “terms and royalties which” and added “and royalties unless prohibited under other provisions of this chapter” at the end, and made minor stylistic changes.

The 2004 amendment by c. 1018, in subsection E, inserted “pursuant to §

28.2-1204

,” substituted “and terms that” for “terms and royalties which” and added “and royalties unless prohibited under other provisions of this chapter” at the end, and made minor stylistic changes.

The 2005 amendments.

The 2005 amendment by c. 839, effective October 1, 2005, substituted “1-200” for “1-10” in the second sentence of subsections A and F.

Law Review.

For note, “Public Regulation of Water Quality in Virginia,” see 13 Wm. & Mary L. Rev. 424 (1971).

For article on siting electric power facilities, see 58 Va. L. Rev. 257 (1972).

For note on purposes and types of wetlands regulation, see 58 Va. L. Rev. 876 (1972).

For survey of Virginia law on property for the year 1972-1973, see 59 Va. L. Rev. 1570 (1973).

For article on stream flow maintenance in Virginia, see 18 U. Rich. L. Rev. 485 (1984).

§ 28.2-1205.1.
Coordinated review of water resources projects.

Applications for water resources projects that require a Virginia Marine Resources permit and an individual Virginia Water Protection Permit under §

62.1-44.15:20

shall be submitted and processed through a joint application and review process.

The Commissioner and the Director of the Department of Environmental Quality, in consultation with the Virginia Institute of Marine Science, the Department of Wildlife Resources, the Department of Historic Resources, the Department of Health, the Department of Conservation and Recreation, the Virginia Department of Agriculture and Consumer Services, and any other appropriate or interested state agency, shall coordinate the joint review process to ensure the orderly evaluation of projects requiring both permits.

The joint review process shall include, but not be limited to, provisions to ensure that: (i) the initial application for the project shall be advertised simultaneously by the Commission and the Department of Environmental Quality; (ii) project reviews shall be completed by all state agencies that have been asked to review and provide comments, within 45 days of project notification by the Commission and the Department of Environmental Quality; (iii) the Commission and the Department of Environmental Quality shall coordinate permit issuance and, to the extent practicable, shall take action on the permit application no later than one year after the agencies have received complete applications; (iv) to the extent practicable, the Commission and the Department of Environmental Quality shall take action concurrently, but no more than six months apart; and (v) upon taking its final action on each permit, the Commission and the Department of Environmental Quality shall provide each other with notification of its action and any and all supporting information, including any background materials or exhibits used in the application.

History.

2005, c. 49; 2020, c. 958; 2022, c. 356.

The 2020 amendments.

The 2020 amendment by c. 958 substituted “Department of Wildlife Resources” for “Department of Game and Inland Fisheries” in subsection B.

The 2022 amendments.

The 2022 amendment by c. 356 in subsection C in clauses (iii) through (v), substituted “Department of Environmental Quality” for “State Water Control Board.”

§ 28.2-1205.2.
Coordinated review of public beach replenishment projects using Chesapeake Bay sand; expedited process.

Applications for sand replenishment projects on public beaches abutting the waters of the Chesapeake Bay that involve the dredging of sand from the Chesapeake Bay and require a permit from the Marine Resources Commission or the Department of Environmental Quality, or both, shall be reviewed and a decision on the issuance of the permit shall be made within 90 days thereafter, or as soon as practicable. These agencies shall establish a working group consisting of representative stakeholders in an effort to develop an effective and efficient process for review and approval of sand replenishment projects.

In developing such an expedited review process, the agencies and working group shall consider a requirement that the application include the submission of a dredging plan by the locality for the areas within the Chesapeake Bay from which the dredged material will be taken and the location of the beach replenishment project. Such a dredging plan, if approved, shall not require a new review procedure if any subsequent removal of bottomland involves material obtained from the area documented in the dredging plan. Any new site proposed for the dredging of sand from the Chesapeake Bay shall require a new or amended dredging plan. A permit issued shall be valid for 10 years.

Any dredging plan required to be submitted with an application shall include the following information:

Geotechnical analysis of the proposed area to be dredged;

Analysis of the benthic, marine, and fishery resources, including a specific analysis of the impact on the crab population;

Current recreational and commercial fishing activity in the proposed dredge area;

Impact on any historical artifacts in the proposed dredge area;

Impact on other uses of the state waters and bottomlands at the dredge site;

Location of the beach areas to be replenished; and

Environmental impact of the dredge material being placed on the beach area.

The Commissioner, in consultation with the Department of Environmental Quality, the State Health Department, the Department of Historic Resources, the Virginia Institute of Marine Science, and any other appropriate or interested state agency, shall coordinate a joint review process to ensure the orderly evaluation of sand replenishment projects requiring a permit for dredging sand from the Chesapeake Bay. All project reviews shall be completed by state agencies within 45 days of receiving the project review request from the Commission or the Department of Environmental Quality.

History.

2013, cc. 45, 196.

§ 28.2-1206.
Fees; exemptions.

A non-refundable processing fee of $100 shall accompany each application (i) submitted for a Commission permit for the use of state-owned submerged lands or (ii) submitted pursuant to §

28.2-1203

. No such processing fee shall be required for an application to explore or recover underwater historic property or to conduct any activity authorized by a Virginia Marine Resources Commission General Permit.

The fee paid to the Commission for issuing each permit to recover underwater historic property shall be $25.The fee paid to the Commission for issuing each permit to use state-owned bottomlands shall be $100; if the cost of the project is to exceed $10,000 but not exceed $500,000, the fee paid shall be $300; and if the cost of the project is to exceed $500,000, the fee paid shall be $600. Riparian owners of (i) commercial facilities engaged in the business of ship construction or repair, (ii) commercial facilities providing services relating to the shipping of domestic or foreign cargo, and (iii) commercial facilities engaged in the business of selling or servicing watercraft shall be exempt from the payment of rents and royalties, except as provided in subsection C.

When the activity or project for which a permit is requested will involve the removal of bottom material, the application shall indicate this fact. If granted, the permit shall specify a royalty of not less than $0.40, nor more than $0.80, per cubic yard of bottom material removed. In fixing the amount of the royalty, the Commission shall consider, among other factors, the following:

The primary and secondary purposes for removing the bottom material;

Whether the material has any commercial value and whether it will be used for any commercial purpose;

The use to be made of the removed material and any public benefit or adverse effect upon the public that will result from the removal or disposal of the material;

The physical characteristics of the material to be removed; and

The expense of removing and disposing of the material.

Where it appears that the project or facility for which a permit application is made has been completed or work thereon commenced at the time application is made, the Commission may impose additional assessments not to exceed an amount of three times the normal permit fee and royalties, unless such royalties are prohibited by this chapter.

Bottom material removed attendant to maintenance dredging or directional drilling shall be exempt from any royalty. The Virginia Department of Transportation shall be exempt from all fees, rents and royalties otherwise assessable under this section. All counties, cities, and towns of the Commonwealth shall pay the required permit fee but shall be exempt from all other fees, rents and royalties assessable under this section if the permit is issued prior to the commencement of any work to be accomplished under the permit.

All fees, rents and royalties collected pursuant to this chapter on and after July 1, 2000, shall be paid into the state treasury to the credit of the Marine Habitat and Waterways Improvement Fund.

Beginning July 1, 2020, and not more frequently than every three years thereafter, the Commission may increase or decrease fees for marine habitat applications, permits, leases, rents, and royalties that are authorized by this chapter, but such increase or decrease shall be no greater than the respective increase or decrease, expressed as a percentage, in the United States Average Consumer Price Index for all items, all urban consumers (CPI-U), as published by the Bureau of Labor Statistics of the U.S. Department of Labor, since the date on which the fee was last set or adjusted.

History.

Code 1950, § 62-2.1; 1960, c. 600; 1962, c. 637; 1966, c. 641; 1968, c. 659, § 62.1-3; 1970, c. 621; 1972, c. 866; 1973, cc. 23, 361; 1974, cc. 92, 385; 1975, c. 431; 1976, c. 579; 1980, c. 253; 1982, c. 102; 1988, c. 868; 1992, c. 836; 2000, c. 1056; 2004, cc. 899, 1018; 2020, c. 806.

Editor’s note.

Acts 2004, cc. 899 and 1018, cl. 2 provides: “That, notwithstanding any provision of law to the contrary, every uncollected rent or royalty assessed by the Virginia Marine Resources Commission prior to July 1, 2004, other than royalties assessed under subsection C of §

28.2-1206

, shall be cancelled and null and void. Such cancellation shall run with the land and to the benefit of the lessees and grantees and their heirs, successors and assigns. Not later than 180 days from the effective date of this act, the Virginia Marine Resources Commission shall mail to every such grantee and lessee written notification of the cancellation of such rents and royalties.”

Acts 2004, cc. 899 and 1018, cl. 3 provides: “That the Commission shall not assess and collect any rents or royalties, except pursuant to subsection C of §

28.2-1206

, until July 1, 2005.”

The 2000 amendments.

The 2000 amendment by c. 1056, effective July 1, 2001, added the second sentence in subsection B; and in subsection F, inserted “on and after July 1, 2000”, and substituted “Marine Habitat and Waterways Improvement” for “Public Oyster Rocks Replenishment.”

The 2004 amendments.

The 2004 amendments by cc. 899 and 1018 are identical, and substituted “$25” for “twenty five dollars” in subsection A; rewrote subsection B; in subsection C, substituted “$.20” for “twenty cents” and “$.60” for “sixty cents”; substituted “that” for “which” in subdivision C 3; added “unless such royalties are prohibited by this chapter” to the end of subsection D; inserted “or directional drilling” in subsection E; and inserted “rents” in subsections E and F.

The 2020 amendments.

The 2020 amendment by c. 806 added subsections A and G and redesignated the remaining subsections; in subsection B, substituted “$100; if the cost of the project is to exceed $10,000 but not exceed $500,000, the fee paid shall be $300; and if the cost of the project is to exceed $500,000, the fee paid shall be $600” for “$25, but if the cost of the project is to exceed $10,000, the fee paid shall be $100”; and in subsection C, substituted “$0.40, nor more than $0.80” for “$.20, nor more than $.60.”

OPINIONS OF THE ATTORNEY GENERAL

Virginia Marine Resources Commission’s authority. —

Regarding application of subsection B, (1) the Virginia Marine Resources Commission may
make reasonable determinations, based on attendant facts, concerning whether a facility qualifies its owner for exemption from the payment of royalties for the use of state-owned
bottomlands; (2) a facility need not be used exclusively for the purposes for which the exemption lies; and (3) any applicable exemption applies to the entire commercial facility, including any part not used for the exempt purpose.. See opinion of Attorney General to The Honorable Mr. Steven G. Bowman, Commissioner, Virginia Marine Resources Commission, 18-013, 2019 Va. AG LEXIS 1 (1/4/19).

It is within the scope of the Virginia Marine Resources Commission’s authority to make reasonable determinations, based on the facts, concerning 1) whether an entity’s facility is a “commercial facility,” and if so, 2) whether a particular service provided at the facility “relates to” the shipping of domestic or foreign cargo such that the facility’s owner would be exempt from the payment of royalties under subsection B of §

28.2-1206

. See opinion of Attorney General to The Honorable Mr. Steven G. Bowman, Commissioner, Virginia Marine Resources Commission, 18-013, 2019 Va. AG LEXIS 1 (1/4/19).